Utah statutes.
72-1-203.   Deputy director -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Other
assistants and advisers -- Salaries.
(1)  The executive director shall appoint a deputy director, who shall be a
registered professional engineer in the state and shall serve at the
discretion of the executive director.
(2)  The deputy director is the chief engineer of the department.  The deputy
director shall assist the executive director and is responsible for:
(a)  program and project development; and
(b)  operation and maintenance of the state transportation systems.
(3)  The executive director may also appoint assistants to administer the
divisions of the department.  These assistants shall serve at the discretion
of the executive director.
(4)  In addition, the executive director may employ other assistants and
advisers as the executive director finds necessary and fix salaries in
accordance with the salary standards adopted by the Department of Human
Resource Management.
